California statutes. Education Code
 demotion or a voluntary reduction in assigned time in lieu of layoff shall be, at the option of the employee, returned to a position in his or her former class or to a position with increased assigned time as vacancies become available, and without limitation of time, but
 if there is a valid reemployment list the employee shall be ranked on that list in accordance with his or her proper seniority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   (AB 2307)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

45300.

Eligibility lists shall be established for a period of not less than one year except that when a list is exhausted for appointments to current vacancies, through use and eligibles being unavailable, the commission may, upon the recommendation of the officer charged with certifying eligibles, and after due notice to eligibles who may have made themselves unavailable for appointment, terminate it before a year has expired.

Eligibility lists may be established for a period of six months upon the approval of the personnel commission as long as the six-months’ duration of such a list is noted in the recruitment bulletin announcing the examination. If a list is exhausted for appointments to current vacancies, through use and eligibles being unavailable, the commission may, upon the recommendation of the officer charged with certifying eligibles, and after due notice to eligibles who may have made themselves unavailable for appointment, terminate it before the expiration date.

A list may be extended for an additional period of two years or less at the discretion of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45301.

(a) A person who has served an initial probationary period in a class not to exceed six months or 130 days of paid service, whichever is longer, as prescribed by the rules of the commission shall be deemed to be in the permanent classified service, except that the commission may establish a probationary period in a class not to exceed one year for classes designated by the commission as executive, administrative, or police classes. To receive permanent classified service status, each full-time peace officer and public safety dispatcher employed by a school district operating a dispatch center certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall serve in a probationary status for a period not less than one year from their date of appointment to that full-time position.

(b) An employee shall not attain permanent status in the classified service until the employee has completed a probationary period in a class. A permanent employee who accepts a promotion and fails to complete the probationary period for that promotional position shall be employed in the classification from which the employee was promoted. In any case the rules of the commission may provide for the exclusion of time while employees are on a leave of absence. The rights of appeal from disciplinary action before attainment of permanent status in the classified service shall be in accordance with Section 45305.

(c) To the extent that this section, as amended by Senate Bill 874 of the 2021–22 Regular Session, conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2023, pursuant
 to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the changes made to this section by Senate Bill 874 of the 2021–22 Regular Session shall not apply to the school district until expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 33.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

45302.

No person in the permanent classified service shall be demoted or removed except for reasonable cause designated by rule of the commission as detrimental to the efficiency of the service. This section shall not be construed to prevent layoffs for lack of work or lack of funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45303.

In addition to any causes for suspension or dismissal which are designated by rule of the commission, employees in the classified service shall be suspended and dismissed in the manner provided by law for any one or more of the following causes:

(a) Knowing membership by the employee in the Communist Party.

(b) Conduct specified in Section 1028 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 388.5.)
-------------------------------------------

45304.

(a) For reasonable causes, an employee may be suspended without pay for not more than 30 days, except as provided in this section, or may be demoted or dismissed. In this case, the school district shall, within 10 days of the suspension, demotion, or dismissal, file written charges with the commission. The personnel director shall give to the employee or deposit in the United States registered mail with postage prepaid, addressed to the employee at his or her last known place of address, a copy of the charges and inform the employee of his or her appeal rights.

(b) Whenever an employee of a school district or county office of education is charged with a mandatory leave of absence offense, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 44940, the governing board of the school district shall immediately place the employee upon a compulsory leave of absence for a period of time extending for not more than 10 days after the date of entry of the judgment in the proceedings. Once the employee is placed on leave of absence, he or she is subject to the provisions of Section 44940.5.

(c) Whenever an employee of a school district or county office of education is charged with an optional leave of absence offense, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44940, the governing board of the school district may immediately place the employee upon a compulsory leave of absence in accordance with the provisions of Section 44940.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 9.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45305.

Any employee in the permanent classified service who has been suspended, demoted, or dismissed may appeal to the commission within 14 days after receipt of a copy of the written charges by filing a written answer to the charges. Such an appeal is not available to an employee who is not in the permanent classified service except as provided by rules of the commission. An employee in the permanent classified service who has not served the time designated by the commission as probationary for the class may be demoted to the class from which promoted without recourse to an appeal or hearing by the commission, except as otherwise provided by rules of the commission; and provided, that such demotion does not result in the separation of the employee from the permanent classified service. Nothing in this section shall operate to alter the protections guaranteed under Section 45309.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45306.

The commission shall investigate the matter on appeal and may require further evidence from either party, and may, and upon request of an accused employee shall, order a hearing. The accused employee shall have the right to appear in person or with counsel and to be heard in his own defense. The decision shall not be subject to review by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45307.

If the commission sustains the employee, it may order paid all or part of his full compensation from the time of suspension, demotion, or dismissal, and it shall order his reinstatement upon such terms and conditions as it may determine appropriate. The commission may modify the disciplinary action, but may not make the action more stringent than that approved by the board. In addition, the commission may direct such other action as it may find necessary to effect a just settlement of the appeal, including, but not limited to, compensation for all or part of the legitimate expenses incurred in pursuit of the appeal, seniority credit for off-duty time pending reinstatement, transfer or change of location of the employee, and expunction from the employee’s personnel record of disciplinary actions, cause, and charges which were not sustained by the commission. Upon receipt of the commission’s written decision the board shall forthwith comply with the provisions thereof. When the board has fully complied with the commission’s decision it shall so notify the commission in writing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45308.

(a) Classified employees shall be subject to layoff for lack of work or lack of funds. If a classified employee is laid off, the order of layoff within the class shall be determined by length of service. The employee who has been employed the shortest time in the class, plus higher classes, shall be laid off first. Reemployment shall be in order of seniority.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, in school districts with an average daily attendance below 250,000 for service commencing or continuing after July 1, 1971, “length of service” means all hours in paid status, whether during the school year, a holiday, recess, or during any period that a school is in session or closed,
 but does not include any hours compensated solely on an overtime basis as provided for in Section 45128. Nothing in this section shall preclude the governing board of a school district from entering into an agreement with the exclusive representative of the classified employees that defines “length of service” to mean the hire date. For purposes of this section, in school districts with an average daily attendance of 250,000 or more, for service commencing or continuing after January 1, 1986, “length of service” shall be determined by the date of hire.

(2) If a governing board enters into an agreement with the exclusive representative of classified employees that defines “length of service” to mean the hire date, the governing board may define “length of service” to mean the hire date for a classification of employee not represented by any
 exclusive bargaining unit.

(c) This section does not preclude the granting of “length of service” credit for time spent on unpaid illness leave, unpaid maternity leave, unpaid family care leave, or unpaid industrial accident leave. In addition, for military leave of absence, “length of service” credit shall be granted pursuant to Section 45297. In the event an employee returns to work following any other unpaid leave of absence, no further seniority shall be accrued for the time not worked.

(d) “Hours in paid status” shall not be interpreted to mean any service performed before entering into a probationary or permanent status in the classified service of the school district except service in restricted positions as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 11.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45309.

Any permanent classified employee of a school district who voluntarily resigns from his permanent classified position may be reinstated or reemployed by the governing board of the district, within 39 months after his last day of paid service and without further competitive examination, to a position in his former classification as a permanent or limited-term employee, or as a permanent or limited-term employee in a related lower class or a lower class in which the employee formerly had permanent status.

If the governing board elects to reinstate or reemploy a person as a permanent employee under the provisions of this section, it shall disregard the break in service of the employee and classify him as, and restore to him all of the rights, benefits and burdens of a permanent employee in the class to which he is reinstated or reemployed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45310.

No warrant shall be drawn by or on behalf of the governing board of any district for the payment of any salary or wage to any employee in the classified service unless the assignment bears the certification of the personnel director that the person named in the assignment has been employed and assigned pursuant to this article and the rules of the commission.

Whenever the commission, after a public hearing, finds that any appointment has been made in violation of this article or the rules of the commission as they apply to examination procedures, the commission may order that no salary warrant shall thereafter be drawn to the employee so appointed, for services rendered after the date of said order. Any violation of this article or the rules of the commission as they apply to examination procedures shall constitute grounds for the dismissal of the employee or employees guilty of such violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45311.

The commission may conduct hearings, subpoena witnesses, require the production of records or information pertinent to investigation, and may administer oaths. It may, at will, inspect any records of the governing board that may be necessary to satisfy itself that the procedures prescribed by the commission have been complied with. Hearings may be held by the commission on any subject to which its authority may extend as described in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45312.

(a) (1) The commission may authorize a hearing officer or other representative to conduct any hearing or investigation that the commission itself is authorized by this article to conduct. Any such authorized person conducting the hearing or investigation may administer oaths, subpoena and require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books or papers, and cause the depositions of witnesses to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for similar depositions in civil cases in the superior court of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The commission may instruct the authorized representative to present findings or recommendations.
 The commission may accept, reject, or amend any of the findings or recommendations of the authorized representative. Any rejection or amendment of findings or recommendations shall be based either on a review of the transcript of the hearing or investigation or upon the results of the supplementary hearing or investigation as the commission may order.

(2) For disciplinary cases against classified employees involving allegations of egregious misconduct, as defined in Section 44932, and involving a minor, as defined in Section 44990, the commission shall hire a judge, as defined in Section 44990, to conduct any hearing or investigation that the commission itself is authorized by this article to conduct. The judge’s ruling shall be binding
 upon all parties.

(3) A judge authorized under this subdivision to conduct a hearing involving allegations as described in Section 44010 or 44011 of this code, or as described in Sections 11165.2 to 11165.6, inclusive, of the Penal Code, shall conduct that hearing in accordance with Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 44990) of Chapter 4 and Section 49077 of this code.

 (4) The term “representative of the respondent,” within the meaning of Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 44990) of Chapter 4, shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, an exclusive labor representative.

(b) The commission may employ hearing officers or other representatives by contract, or as professional experts or otherwise, and
 may adopt and amend rules and procedures as necessary to effectuate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 996, Sec. 3.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

45313.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the legal counsel of the governing board shall aid and represent the commission in all legal matters. If the legal counsel does not respond to a written request by the commission for aid or representation within 15 working days of receipt of the written request, the legal counsel is deemed to have refused to aid or represent the commission in that matter. 

(b) (1) The legal counsel shall refuse to represent the commission in circumstances in which the legal counsel knows, or has reason to know,
 that at the time the request is made a conflict exists between the interests of the commission and the interests of the governing board or the school district.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a member of the commission may also declare that a conflict exists between the interests of the commission and the interests of the governing board or the school district. A conflict shall not be found pursuant to this paragraph unless approved by a majority vote of the members of the commission. 

 (c) If the legal counsel or the commission
 finds that a conflict exists, or if the legal counsel otherwise refuses to aid or represent the commission in a legal matter, the commission may employ its own attorney, and the reasonable cost of the attorney shall constitute a legal charge against the general funds of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 48, Sec. 1.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

45317.

Any person who willfully or through culpable negligence violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. It is also unlawful for any person:

(a) Willfully by himself or in cooperation with another person to defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person with respect to his right of examination, application, or employment under this article or commission rule.

(b) Willfully and falsely to mark, grade, estimate, or report upon the examination or proper standing of any person examined or certified under this article or commission rule, or to aid in so doing, or make any false representation concerning the same or the person examined.

(c) Willfully to furnish to any person any special or secret information regarding contents of an examination for the purpose of either improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person examined, or to be examined under this article or commission rule.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45318.

In every school district coterminous with the boundaries of a city and county, except for those paraprofessionals excluded from the charter provisions by a resolution adopted by the governing board of that district pursuant to Section 45100, employees not employed in positions requiring certification qualifications shall be employed, if the city and county has a charter providing for a merit system of employment, pursuant to the provisions of that charter providing for that system and shall, in all respects, be subject to, and have all rights granted by, those provisions; provided, however, that the governing board of the school district shall have the right to fix the duties of all of its noncertificated employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 287, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45319.

(a) A merit (civil service) system within a school district may be terminated by one of the following methods:

(1) (A) If the governing board of a school district, or a county board of education, receives a written petition of qualified electors not less in number than 10 percent of the number voting in the last election for a member of the board calling for the termination of the merit (civil service) system and the system has been in operation for not less than five years or has been imposed pursuant to the terms of Section 45119 or 45120, the board shall order the county superintendent of schools to place the question of termination of the system on the ballot at the next regular governing board
 member election, or county board of education member election, or the next primary or general election in a general election year, whichever is the earlier after receipt by the county superintendent of schools.

(B) The statement of purpose of the election shall read:

“Shall the merit (civil service) system for school employees not requiring certification qualifications, as provided for in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code of the State of California, and which has been in operation for at least five years, be terminated by the ____ School District of ____ County (or counties, where appropriate), or by the County Office of Education of ____ County on ____ (date to be specified by board)?”

(C) The petition calling for the election, to be valid, shall contain the
 statement of purpose for the election as contained in this section.

(2) (A) If the governing board of a school district, or the county board of education, receives a written petition from 40 percent of the classified employees entitled to vote calling for the termination of the merit (civil service) system and the system has been in operation for not less than five years or has been imposed pursuant to the terms of Section 45119 or 45120, the governing board of the school district shall conduct an election by secret ballot of its classified personnel to determine whether or not they desire to have the merit system terminated within the school district. The ballot shall read: “Shall the merit (civil service) system for classified employees be terminated in the ____ (name of school district, or county office of education) as of ____ (termination date)?”

(B) As
 used in this subdivision, “classified employees” means all personnel who are a part of the classified service who are appointed in accordance with Section 45272.

(C) In order to be valid, the petition calling for the termination of the merit (civil service) system shall be submitted to the governing board of the school district within 90 days after the date that the notice for the circulation of the petition was filed with the governing board of the school district. The election shall be held during the regular school year and shall be held no earlier than 45 days and no later than 180 days after the date that the petition was submitted to the governing board of the school district.

(D) If the merit system was adopted pursuant to Section 45224.5, classified employees entitled to vote in an election pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to those classified employees who
 reside in the school district.

(E) The governing board of the school district shall devise an identification system designed to protect against fraud in the balloting process while also ensuring ballot secrecy. In addition, the governing board of the school district shall appoint a three-member tabulation committee consisting of one member of the governing board of the school district, one member of the personnel commission of the school district, and one member who shall be a classified employee of the school district designated by the largest exclusive representative of classified employees within the school district. It shall be the responsibility of the tabulation committee to canvass the election ballots and to certify the results of the election to the governing board of the school district at the next regular meeting of the governing board of the school district following the completion of the tabulation of the election ballots by the
 committee. No representative of the school district shall make any marks upon the ballot envelope or ballot of any employee, except that the tabulation committee may adopt a system of uniformly stamping in a consistent manner and in the same location on all ballots received or all ballots counted, or both of those, to help ensure an accurate count.

(F) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of the school district shall not be required to provide release time for classified personnel to vote in an election conducted pursuant to this paragraph. The governing board of the school district shall not conduct an election under this paragraph more than once in any two-year period.

(G) Members of the classified service shall be provided an adequate and ample opportunity to be informed of the arguments in favor of and in opposition to the termination of the merit (civil service)
 system before the conducting of an election called pursuant to this paragraph. That opportunity shall include an open forum during which proponents of, and opponents to, the termination of the merit (civil service) system shall be permitted to debate the issue.

(b) If the school district communicates with classified employees in favor of terminating the merit (civil service) system, it shall provide at least equal time and equal access to any exclusive representative of classified employees within the school district to communicate against terminating that system. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the rights of an exclusive representative under the Educational Employment Relations Act (Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code) for access to communicate its position on terminating the system.

(c) (1) It shall be unlawful for a public school employer and the exclusive representative of the classified employees of a school district to include the subject of the termination of the merit (classified service) system within the scope of representation.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or any other law, all election procedures not specified above for an election pursuant to this section shall be within the scope of representation of an exclusive representative under Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, including the rules for campaigning, the election date, time, and place, translation of the ballot, electioneering near the polls, and balloting methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 88, Sec. 2.   (AB 289)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

45320.

If the majority of the qualified electors vote to terminate the merit system in a school district, or a county office of education, or if the majority of the classified employees vote to terminate the merit system in a school district, or a county office of education the personnel commission shall cease to function on the date specified in the election and the law pertaining to merit system districts, or county offices of education shall cease to have any force or effect in that district or county office of education.

Simultaneously, with the termination of the merit system, the governing board shall adopt rules and regulations relating to classified school employees as required by Section 45113.

Notwithstanding an action to terminate the merit system in a school district, or county office of education, the provisions of Section 45221, 45223, and 45224 shall be applicable at any time after at least two years have elapsed after the system has ceased to operate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 188, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Paraprofessionals [45330. - 45330.]

45330.

(a) As used in this section, a paraprofessional means a person who assists classroom teachers and other certificated personnel in instructing reading, writing, and mathematics. A paraprofessional includes an instructional aide as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 45343 and a teacher aide as described in Section 45360.

(b) A paraprofessional shall perform only duties that, in the judgment of the certificated personnel to whom the instructional aide is assigned, may be performed by a person not licensed as a classroom teacher. These duties shall not include assignment of grades to pupils.

(c) Pursuant to the federal
 No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (P.L. 107-110), a local education agency that receives funding from Title I of that act shall ensure that every paraprofessional hired on or after January 8, 2002, who is supported by those Title I funds and who assists in instruction has demonstrated at least one of the following in addition to any other requirements under that act:

(1) Completion of at least two years of study at an institution of higher education.

(2) Possession of an associate’s degree or higher.

(3) Through a local or state assessment, that is appropriate to the responsibilities to be assigned to the paraprofessional, knowledge of, and ability to assist in, instructing reading, writing, and mathematics.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (h), a
 paraprofessional hired prior to January 8, 2002, who is supported by federal funds from Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (P.L. 107-110) shall meet the requirements of subdivision (c) no later than January 8, 2006.

(e) No person shall be initially assigned to assist in instruction as a paraprofessional in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, unless the person has demonstrated proficiency in reading, writing, and mathematics skills up to or exceeding that required by the employing district for high school seniors pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (f) of Section 51220 if the employing district educates high school pupils.

(f) If the employing district is an elementary school district, the paraprofessional shall demonstrate proficiency in reading, writing, and mathematics skills up to or exceeding that required for high school seniors pursuant to
 subdivisions (a) and (f) of Section 51220 in the high school district that includes all or the largest portion of the elementary district.

(g) In establishing the educational qualifications or in developing a proficiency exam, a school district shall align the qualifications and proficiency exams pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(h) A paraprofessional who is supported by federal funds from Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (P.L. 107-110) and who meets either of the following conditions is exempt from the requirements described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (c):

(1) The paraprofessional is proficient in English and a language other than English and provides services primarily to enhance participation of pupils by acting as a translator.

(2) The paraprofessional’s duties consist solely of conducting parental involvement activities.

(i) A paraprofessional who was hired on or before January 1, 2003, and who has previously demonstrated, through a local assessment, knowledge of, and an ability to assist in, instructing reading, writing, and mathematics, is deemed to have met the proficiency exam requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(j) A school district may use an existing proficiency assessment or may develop a new proficiency assessment to meet the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(k) Pursuant to the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (P.L. 107-110), a local education agency may use a portion of the funds from that act for staff development for
 paraprofessionals, to the extent that those funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 68.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Instructional Aides [45340. - 45349.]

45340.

This article may be cited as the Instructional Aide Act of 1968. The provisions of this article shall apply to personnel referred to in Sections 35021, 44833, 44835, 54422, 54481, 54482, 54525, or any other section heretofore or hereafter enacted, who perform the duties of instructional aides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45341.

The Legislature recognizes the need to provide classroom teachers and other certificated personnel with more time to teach and to provide the means for them to utilize their professional knowledge and skills more effectively in the educational programs of the public schools. It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the employment of instructional aides in order that classroom teachers and other certificated personnel may draw upon the services of such aides to assist them in ways determined to be useful in improving the quality of educational opportunities for pupils.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45342.

Instructional aides shall not be utilized to increase the number of pupils in relation to the number of classroom teachers in any school, any school district, or in the state. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, class size ratios existing in special education classes prior to November 13, 1968, may be maintained or decreased, but not increased, by use of instructional aides.

All instructional aide positions in a school district shall be assigned the basic title of “instructional aide” or other appropriate title designated by the governing board. To provide for differences in responsibilities and duties, additions to the basic title may be assigned such as “instructional aide I or II” or “instructional aide—volunteer,” or other appropriate title.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45343.

(a) As used in this article, “instructional aide” means a person employed to assist classroom teachers and other certificated personnel in the performance of their duties and in the supervision of pupils and in instructional tasks which, in the judgment of the certificated personnel to whom the instructional aide is assigned, may be performed by a person not licensed as a classroom teacher.

(b) “Any school district” means a school district or a county superintendent of schools who employs classroom teachers in the public schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45344.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this article, any school district may employ instructional aides to assist classroom teachers and other certificated personnel in the performance of duties as defined in Section 45343. An instructional aide shall perform only such duties as, in the judgment of the certificated personnel to whom the instructional aide is assigned, may be performed by a person not licensed as a classroom teacher. These duties shall not include assignment of grades to pupils. An instructional aide need not perform such duties in the physical presence of the teacher but the teacher shall retain his responsibility for the instruction and supervision of the pupils in his charge.

(b) Educational qualifications for instructional aides shall be prescribed by the school district employer and shall be appropriate to the responsibilities to be assigned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45344.5.

(a) No person shall be initially assigned to assist in instruction as an instructional aide unless the person has demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills pursuant to Section 45330.

(b) A school district may charge prospective aides taking the district’s proficiency test a fee to fund the costs incurred by the district in giving the test. This fee may be subject to negotiation between the district and the exclusive representative of instructional aides, but in no event shall the fee exceed seven dollars ($7).

(c) An instructional aide who passes a district proficiency test as required by this section, transfers to another district, and is employed in the same capacity shall be considered to have met the proficiency standards for purposes of this section unless the district to which he or she has transferred determines that the test taken by the aide is not comparable to the standards required by the employing district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1080, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

45345.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 48950, no instructional aide shall give out any personal information concerning any pupil who is not his own child or ward, except under judicial process, to any person other than a teacher or administrator in the school which the pupil attends. A violation of this section may be a cause for disciplinary action, including dismissal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45346.

Classroom teachers and other certificated personnel shall not be required to hold a standard supervision credential or a standard administration credential as a prerequisite to the supervision and direction of instructional aides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45347.

(a) An instructional aide shall not be deemed a certificated employee for the purposes of apportioning state aid and no regrouping of pupils with instructional aides shall be construed as a class for apportionment purposes.

(b) Instructional aides shall be classified employees of the district, and shall be subject to all of the rights, benefits, and burdens of the classified service, except as specified in Section 45105 for “restricted” positions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45348.

The school district shall pay to each person employed as an instructional aide compensation at a rate not less than the minimum hourly rate prescribed by federal law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45349.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, or any other provisions of law, a school district may utilize volunteers in the supervision and instruction of pupils, but any such volunteer shall be subject to the provisions of Section 35021 and this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Teacher Assistants [45350. - 45356.]

45350.

The purposes of this article include the following:

(a) To enhance the teaching of reading, language arts, mathematics, social science, science, and other basic academic subjects to general education pupils in grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(b) To begin to reduce the impact of large classes in grades 1 to 6, inclusive, through the use of trained teacher assistants, operating within the classroom of a certificated teacher under the direction of that teacher.

(c) To develop, in persons who want to be teacher assistants, competency in specific academic subjects that are part of the curriculum in grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and in child development theory. In order to qualify as a teacher assistant for purposes of this article, a person shall meet both of the following conditions:

(1) Successful completion of a two-year course of study at a California community college, pursuant to which the applicant has been awarded an Associate of Arts, Teacher Assistant degree.

(2) Passage of an examination developed and administered for this purpose by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1345, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45351.
